Washington statutes.
RCW 36.24.180

Audit of coroner's account.

Before auditing and allowing the account of the coroner the board of county commissioners shall require from him or her a verified statement in writing, accounting for all money or other property found upon persons on whom inquests have been held by him or her, and that the money or property mentioned in it has been delivered to the legal representatives of the deceased, or to the county treasurer.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4040; 1963 c 4 s 36.24.180. Prior: Code 1881 s 2792; 1863 p 562 s 18; 1854 p 438 s 18; RRS s 4197.]